Utah statutes.
10-3-905.   Fees to be paid in advance.
The city engineer shall not record any drawings or instruments, or file any
papers or notices, or furnish any copies, or render any service connected with
his office, until the fees for the same are paid or tendered as prescribed by
law or ordinance.
